italian.dict
accrescere/ABDGKOTWY1
alludere/ABDGKOTWY1
ammettere/ABDGKOTWY1
annettere/ABDGKOTWY1
ardere/ABDGKOTWY1
arridere/ABDGKOTWY1
ascrivere/ABDGKOTWY1
aspergere/ABCGKOTWY1
assistere/ABCGKOTWY1
assumere/ABDGKOTWY1
assurgere/ABCGKOTWY1
attorcere/ABCGKOTWY1
avvalere/ABDIKOTWY1
chiudere/ABDGKOTWY1
circoncidere/ABDGKOTWY1
circoscrivere/ABDGKOTWY1
coincidere/ABDGKOTWY1
collidere/ABDGKOTWY1
colludere/ABDGKOTWY1
commettere/ABDGKOTWY1
commuovere/ABDGKOTWY1
comprimere/ABDGKOTWY1
compromettere/ABDGKOTWY1
concludere/ABCGKOTWY1
condividere/ABDGKOTWY1
connettere/ABDGKOTWY1
conoscere/ABDGKOTWY1zx
conquidere/ABDGKOTWY1
consistere/ABCGKOTWY1
contraddistinguere/ABCGKOTWY1
convivere/ABDGKOTWY1
corrodere/ABDGKOTWY1
corrompere/ABDGKOTWY1
coscrivere/ABDGKOTWY1
crescere/ABDGKOTWY1
dattiloscrivere/ABCGKOTWY1
decidere/ABDGKOTWY1
decrescere/ABDGKOTWY1
deludere/ABDGKOTWY1
deprimere/ABDGKOTWY1
deridere/ABDGKOTWY1
descrivere/ABDGKOTWY1
desistere/ABCGKOTWY1
desumere/ABDGKOTWY1
devolvere/ABCGKOTWY1
dimettere/ABDGKOTWY1
dirompere/ABDGKOTWY1
dischiudere/ABDGKOTWY1
disconnettere/ABCGKOTWY1
disconoscere/ABDGKOTWY1
discutere/ABDGKOTWY1
disilludere/ABDGKOTWY1
disperdere/ABDGKOTWY1
dispiacere/ABDIKOTWY1
disseppellire/ABCGKOSTVWY1
dissolvere/ABDGKOTWY1
dissuadere/ABDGKOTWY1
distinguere/ABDGKOTWY1
dividere/ABDGKOTWY1
elidere/ABDGKOTWY1
emettere/ABDGKOTWY1z
equivalere/ABDIKOTWY1
ergere/ABCGKOTWY1
erodere/ABDGKOTWY1
erompere/ABDGKOTWY1
escludere/ABDGKOTWY1
esistere/ABCGKOTWY1
espandere/ABDGKOTWY1
esplodere/ABCGKOTWY1z
esprimere/ABDGKOTWY1z
estinguere/ABDGKOTWY1
estromettere/ABDGKOTWY1
estrovertere/ABCGKOTWY1
evolvere/ABCGKOTWY1
flettere/ABDGKOTWY1
frammettere/ABDGKOTWY1
illudere/ABDGKOTWY1
immettere/ABDGKOTWY1
imprimere/ABDGKOTWY1
incidere/ABDGKOTWY1
incuocere/ABCGKOTWY1
incutere/ABDGKOTWY1
inscrivere/ABDGKOTWY1
insistere/ABCGKOTWY1
interrompere/ABDGKOTWY1
intridere/ABDGKOTWY1
intromettere/ABDGKOTWY1
invadere/ABDGKOTWY1
invalere/ABDIKOTWY1
involvere/ABCGKOTWY1
irridere/ABDGKOTWY1
iscrivere/ABDGKOTWY1
ledere/ABDGKOTWY1
manomettere/ABDGKOTWY1
mescere/ABCGKOTWY1
mettere/ABDGKOTWY1
misconoscere/ABDGKOTWY1
mordere/ABDGKOTWY1
muovere/ABDGKOTWY1
negligere/ABCGKOTWY1
occludere/ABDGKOTWY1
omettere/ABDGKOTWY1
opprimere/ABDGKOTWY1
parcere/ABCGKOTWY1
parere/1ABDGKOTWYa
pascere/ABCGKOTWY1
percuotere/ABDGKOTWY1
perdere/ABDGKOSTVWY1z
permanere/ABDIKOTWY1
permettere/ABDGKOTWY1
persuadere/ABDGKOTWY1
pervadere/ABDGKOTWY1
piacere/1ABDIKOTWYa
precludere/ABDGKOTWY1
prediligere/ABCGKOTWY1
preesistere/ABCGKOTWY1
preludere/ABDGKOTWY1
premettere/ABDGKOTWY1
presumere/ABDGKOTWY1
prevalere/ABDIKOTWY1
promettere/ABDGKOTWY1
promuovere/ABDGKOTWY1
prorompere/ABDGKOTWY1
proscrivere/ABDGKOTWY1
racchiudere/ABCGKOTWY1
radere/ABDGKOTWY1
radioassistere/ABCGKOTWY1
recidere/ABDGKOTWY1
recludere/ABCGKOTWY1
redimere/ABDGKOTWY1
redirigere/ABCGKOTWY1
reimmergere/ABCGKOTWY1
reprimere/ABDGKOTWY1
resistere/ABCGKOTWY1
riammettere/ABDGKOTWY1
riannettere/ABDGKOTWY1
riardere/ABDGKOTWY1
riassumere/ABDGKOTWY1
richiudere/ABDGKOTWY1
ricommettere/ABDGKOTWY1
riconnettere/ABDGKOTWY1
ricrescere/ABDGKOTWY1
ridere/ABDGKOTWY1
ridiscutere/ABDGKOTWY1
ridividere/ABDGKOTWY1
riflettere/ABDGKOSTVWY1
rimanere/ABDIKOTWY1
rimettere/ABDGKOTWY1
rimordere/ABDGKOTWY1
rimuovere/ABDGKOTWY1
rinchiudere/ABDGKOTWY1
rincrescere/ABDGKOTWY1
ripercuotere/ABDGKOTWY1
ripromettere/ABDGKOTWY1
riscuotere/ABDGKOTWY1
risolvere/ABDGKOTWY1
ritrasmettere/ABDGKOTWY1
rivivere/ABDGKOTWY1
rodere/ABDGKOTWY1
rompere/ABDGKOTWY1
schiudere/ABDGKOTWY1
scommettere/ABDGKOTWY1
scompiacere/ABCGKOTWY1
sconnettere/ABDGKOTWY1
scrivere/ABDGKOTWY1zx
scuocere/ABCGKOTWY1
scuotere/ABDGKOTWY1
seppellire/ABCGKOSTVWY1
sfriggere/ABCGKOTWY1
smettere/ABDGKOTWY1
smungere/ABCGKOTWY1
smuovere/ABDGKOTWY1
socchiudere/ABDGKOTWY1
solvere/ABDGKOTWY1
sopprimere/ABDGKOTWY1
sopravvivere/ABDGKOTWY1
sottomettere/ABDGKOTWY1
spandere/ABDGKOTWY1z
spiacere/ABDIKOTWY1
suddistinguere/ABDGKOTWY1
sussistere/ABCGKOTWY1
teletrasmettere/ABDGKOTWY1
trascrivere/ABDGKOTWY1
uccidere/ABDGKOTWY1
videoscrivere/ABDGKOTWY1
vivere/ABDGKOTWY1
